Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3124
Property of departments transferred to Department of Health and Human Services; how treated.

On July 1, 2007, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Health and Human Services Finance and Support, and the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure pertaining to the duties and functions transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to the Health and Human Services Act shall become the property of such department.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 15.